Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Collateral references. —

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Logs and Timber, § 67.

98 C.J.S., Woods and Forests, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 41.15.900.
Observance of Arbor Day.

To increase public awareness of the vital importance of the conservation and propagation of trees and forests to the everyday life of the citizens of Alaska, the third Monday in May of each year is designated “Arbor Day.”
It shall be observed by appropriate school assemblies and programs and shall be the occasion for other suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public in general.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1973)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.15.400. Renumbered in 1983.